Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-170
Changed boundaries; record; certified copy as evidence.

Upon the filing of the copies of the order, as mentioned in section 46-169, the secretary shall record in the minutes of the board the petition aforesaid; and the minutes, or a certified copy thereof, shall be admissible in evidence with the same effect as the petition.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 43, p. 295;

R.S.1913, § 3501;

C.S.1922, § 2901;

C.S.1929, § 46-146;

R.S.1943, § 46-170.